Hawaii statutes.
[§431:3A-303]
Limits on sharing account number information for marketing purposes. (a) A licensee shall not disclose, directly or
through an affiliate other than to a consumer reporting agency, a policy number
or similar form of access number or access code for a consumer’s policy or
transaction account to any nonaffiliated third party for use in telemarketing,
direct mail marketing, or other marketing through electronic mail to the
consumer.

(b)
Subsection (a) does not apply if a licensee discloses a policy number or
similar form of access number or access code:

(1) To the licensee’s service provider solely in
order to perform marketing for the licensee’s own products or services, if the
service provider is not authorized to directly initiate charges to the account;

(2) To a licensee who is a producer solely in order
to perform marketing for the licensee’s own products or services; or

(3) To a participant in an affinity or similar
program if the participants in the program are identified to the customer when
the customer enters into the program. [L 2001, c 220, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next